Hawaii statutes.
§436E-7 Powers and duties of the board.
In addition to any other powers and duties authorized by law, the board shall:

(1) Adopt rules in accordance with chapter 91 to
carry out the purposes of this chapter, with special emphasis on the health and
safety of the public;

(2) Develop standards for licensure;

(3) Prepare, administer, and grade examinations,
provided that the board may contract with a testing agency to provide those
services;

(4) Issue, renew, suspend, and revoke licenses;

(5) Register applicants or holders of a license;

(6) Investigate and conduct hearings regarding any
violation of this chapter and any rules of the board;

(7) Maintain a record of its proceedings; and

(8) Do all things necessary to carry out the
functions, powers, and duties set forth in the chapter. [L 1985, c 214, pt of
§1; am L 1992, c 202, §23]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next